Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,110
Implementation or enforcement agreements authorized.

The department may receive grants-in-aid or receive and disperse pass-through funds or otherwise cooperate and enter into agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture or any other person in the department's implementation or enforcement of the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act or federal programs related to plant protection or plant pests in the state.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 39;

Laws 2017, LB274, § 3.